Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.560

Media violence—Reporting reduction efforts.

The legislature encourages the use of a statewide voluntary, socially responsible policy to reduce the emphasis, amount, and type of violence in all public media. The department shall develop a suggested reporting format for use by the print, television, and radio media in reporting their voluntary violence reduction efforts. Each area of the public media may carry out the policy in whatever manner that area deems appropriate.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 205.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.